lexc/verb/enhuigeh.lexc
LEXICON Case
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON Case1
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
!+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerb3
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case3;


LEXICON Case3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igeo§l #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igea§sz #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
!+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeo§tt      #;    ! t

!bitorol:bitorl
LEXICON AddVerb3mely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case3mely;

LEXICON Verb
acsarog:acsarg AddVerb3;
alapszabályoz:alapszabályz AddVerb3;
andalog:andalg AddVerb3;
bazsalyog:bazsalyg AddVerb3;
bicsakol:bicsakl AddVerb3;
birtokol:birtokl AddVerb3;
bitorol:bitorl AddVerb3;
bolyog:bolyg AddVerb3;
bomol:boml AddVerb3;
bujdokol:bujdokl AddVerb3;
bájolog:bájolg AddVerb3;
csavarog:csavarg AddVerb3;
csikorog:csikorg AddVerb3;
csorog:csorg AddVerb3;
csurog:csurg AddVerb3;
céloz:célz AddVerb3mely;
dohányoz:dohányz AddVerb3;
egyensúlyoz:egyensúlyz AddVerb3;
ellenrendszabályoz:ellenrendszabályz AddVerb3;
ellensúlyoz:ellensúlyz AddVerb3;
fanyalog:fanyalg AddVerb3;
fintorog:fintorg AddVerb3;
forog:forg AddVerb3;
foszol:foszl AddVerb3;
fuldokol:fuldokl AddVerb3;
fuvaroz:fuvarz AddVerb3;
gomolyog:gomolyg AddVerb3;
gondnokol:gondnokl AddVerb3;
gyakorol:gyakorl AddVerb3;
haboz:habz AddVerb3;
haldokol:haldokl AddVerb3;
hangoz:hangz AddVerb3;
hiányoz:hiányz AddVerb3;
horgonyoz:horgonyz AddVerb3;
hunyorog:hunyorg AddVerb3;
háborog:háborg AddVerb3;
háramol:háraml AddVerb3;
hármasszabályoz:hármasszabályz AddVerb3;
hólyagoz:hólyagz AddVerb3;
imbolyog:imbolyg AddVerb3;
inog:ing AddVerb3mely;
irányoz:irányz AddVerb3;
jobbkézszabályoz:jobbkézszabályz AddVerb3;
jogszabályoz:jogszabályz AddVerb3;
kanyarog:kanyarg AddVerb3;
kavarog:kavarg AddVerb3;
kormányoz:kormányz AddVerb3;
korog:korg AddVerb3;
kotor:kotr AddVerb3;
kucorog:kucorg AddVerb3;
kuncsorog:kuncsorg AddVerb3;
kuporog:kuporg AddVerb3;
kutymorog:kutymorg AddVerb3;
kínoz:kínz AddVerb3mely;
kódorog:kódorg AddVerb3;
kóvályog:kóvályg AddVerb3;
légszabályoz:légszabályz AddVerb3;
magoz:magz AddVerb3;
mocorog:mocorg AddVerb3;
morog:morg AddVerb3;
mosolyog:mosolyg AddVerb3;
nyavalyog:nyavalyg AddVerb3;
nyikorog:nyikorg AddVerb3;
oldalog:oldalg AddVerb3;
omol:oml AddVerb3;
oroz:orz AddVerb3;
oszol:oszl AddVerb3;
osztályoz:osztályz AddVerb3;
parancsnokol:parancsnokl AddVerb3;
párolog:párolg AddVerb3;
pároz:párz AddVerb3;
rabol:rabl AddVerb3;
ragoz:ragz AddVerb3;
rendszabályoz:rendszabályz AddVerb3;
romol:roml AddVerb3;
rostokol:rostokl AddVerb3;
sajog:sajg AddVerb3;
somolyog:somolyg AddVerb3;
sompolyog:sompolyg AddVerb3;
sugároz:sugárz AddVerb3;
sutyorog:sutyorg AddVerb3;
szabályoz:szabályz AddVerb3;
szivárog:szivárg AddVerb3;
szoroz:szorz AddVerb3;
szónokol:szónokl AddVerb3;
születésszabályoz:születésszabályz AddVerb3;
sóvárog:sóvárg AddVerb3;
tajtékoz:tajtékz AddVerb3mely;
toboroz:toborz AddVerb3;
toporog:toporg AddVerb3;
torol:torl AddVerb3;
totyorog:totyorg AddVerb3;
tulajdonol:tulajdonl AddVerb3;
támolyog:támolyg AddVerb3;
tántorog:tántorg AddVerb3;
társalog:társalg AddVerb3;
távvezérel:távvezérl AddVerb3;
tébolyog:tébolyg AddVerb3;
tékozol:tékozl AddVerb3;
túloz:túlz AddVerb3;
varázsol:varázsl AddVerb3;
vicsorog:vicsorg AddVerb3;
vigyorog:vigyorg AddVerb3;
virágoz:virágz AddVerb3;
visszhangoz:visszhangz AddVerb3;
viszolyog:viszolyg AddVerb3;
vádol:vádl AddVerb3;
vándorol:vándorl AddVerb3;
vánszorog:vánszorg AddVerb3;
zajog:zajg AddVerb3;
zsivajog:zsivajg AddVerb3;
zuborog:zuborg AddVerb3;
zuhanyoz:zuhanyz AddVerb3;
ácsorog:ácsorg AddVerb3;
ámolyog:ámolyg AddVerb3;
áramol:áraml AddVerb3;
